Missouri, session 2026, HB1802.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.105 and 115.107, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 115.105 and 115.107, to read as follows:
115.105. 1. The chair of the county committee of each political party named on the
ballot shall have the right to designate a challenger for each polling place, who may be
present [until all] while ballots are cast on [the day of] election day or, in first class counties
and charter counties, during the absentee voting period, and a challenger for each location
at which absentee ballots are counted, who may be present while the ballots are being
prepared for counting and counted. No later than four business days before [the election] a
challenger may enter a polling location, the chair of each county committee of each
political party named on the ballot shall provide signed official designation forms with the
names of the designated challengers and substitutes to the local election authority for
confirmation of eligibility to serve as a challenger. The local election authority, after
verifying the eligibility of each designated and substitute challenger, shall sign off on the
official designation forms, unless the challenger is found not to have the qualifications
established by subsection 4 of this section. If the election authority determines that a
challenger does not meet the qualifications of subsection 4 of this section, the designating
party chair may designate a replacement challenger and provide the local election authority
with the name of the replacement challenger before 5:00 p.m. of the Monday preceding the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1802 2
election. The designating chair may substitute challengers at his or her discretion during such
hours.
2. Challenges may only be made when the challenger believes the election laws of
this state have been or will be violated, and each challenger shall report any such belief to the
election judges, or to the election authority if not satisfied with the decision of the election
judges.
3. Prior to the close of the polls, challengers may list and give out the names of those
who have voted. The listing and giving out of names of those who have voted by a challenger
shall not be considered giving information tending to show the state of the count.
4. All persons selected as challengers shall have the same qualifications required by
section 115.085 for election judges, except that such challenger shall be a registered voter in
the jurisdiction of the election authority for which the challenger is designated as a challenger.
5. Any challenge by a challenger to a voter's identification for validity shall be made
only to the election judges or other election authority. If the poll challenger is not satisfied
with the decision of the election judges, then he or she may report his or her belief that the
election laws of this state have been or will be violated to the election authority as allowed
under this section.
115.107. 1. At every election, the chairman of the county committee of each political
party named on the ballot shall have the right to designate a watcher for each place votes are
counted. No later than four business days before a watcher may enter a polling or
counting location, the chair of each county committee of each political party named on
the ballot shall provide signed official designation forms with the names of the
designated watchers and substitutes to the local election authority for confirmation of
eligibility to serve as a watcher. The local election authority, after verifying the
eligibility of each designated and substitute watcher, shall sign off on the official
designation forms, unless the watcher is found not to have the qualifications established
by subsection 5 of this section. If the election authority determines that a watcher does
not meet the qualifications of subsection 5 of this section, the designating party chair
may designate a replacement watcher and provide the local election authority with the
name of the replacement watcher before 5:00 p.m. of the Monday preceding the
election. The designating chair may substitute watchers at his or her discretion during
such hours.
2. Watchers are to observe the counting of the votes and present any complaint of
irregularity or law violation to the election judges, or to the election authority if not satisfied
with the decision of the election judges. No watcher may be substituted for another on
election day.

HB 1802 3
3. No watcher shall report to anyone the name of any person who has or has not
voted.
4. A watcher may remain present until all closing certification forms are completed,
all equipment is closed and taken down, the transportation case for the ballots is sealed,
election materials are returned to the election authority or to the designated collection place
for a polling place, and any other duties or procedures required under sections 115.447 to
115.491 are completed. A watcher may also remain present at each in-person absentee
voting location in first class counties and charter counties at which absentee ballots are
counted or prepared for counting and may remain present while such ballots are being
prepared for counting and counted.
5. All persons selected as watchers shall have the same qualifications required by
section 115.085 for election judges, except that such watcher shall be a registered voter in the
jurisdiction of the election authority for which the watcher is designated as a watcher.
✔